California, session 20252026, AB1311.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) In October 2020, Governor Gavin Newsom issued Executive Order No. N-82-20, advancing biodiversity conservation as an administration priority and elevating the role of nature in the fight against climate change. As part of this executive order, California committed to the goal of conserving 30 percent of the state’s lands and coastal waters by 2030, known as the 30x30 goal.(b) In response, in April 2022, the Natural Resources Agency released the Pathways to 30x30 Report, which calls for an increase in voluntary conservation easements as a key pathway to achieve the 30x30 goal, including conserving an additional 6,000,000 acres of lands and 500,000 acres of coastal waters needed to reach the 30 percent conservation goals by 2030.(c) In 2024, the voters of California approved the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Act of 2024, which provided a source of funding for a comprehensive range of projects, including supporting California’s climate-smart, sustainable, and resilient farms, ranches, and working lands.(d) California’s working rangelands provide a myriad of ecosystem services to the people of California.(e) Livestock grazing occurs on approximately 32,000,000 acres of California’s rangelands in all 58 counties, of which 17,000,000 acres are privately owned and actively managed by their stewards.(f) Livestock grazing can be used as an effective tool to establish and manage protective buffers against wildfire and help mitigate climate change.(g) Livestock provide food, fiber, and food security and are important to California’s economy and historical heritage. The cattle industry specifically represents the third most valuable commodity in the state, having accounted for $4,760,000,000 in revenue in 2023.(h) California’s rangelands are one of the world’s major biodiversity hot spots and support thousands of plants and animal species, many of which are listed as threatened or endangered under the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) or the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.). These rangelands and working lands also provide habitat connectivity, which is critical for the migration of many species of wildlife.(i) California’s tourism and hunting economy depends on healthy game species that rely on California’s rangelands for their habitat.(j) Proper grazing management maintains rangelands’ capacity to attenuate waterborne pollutants and supply clean water.(k) The Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Act of 2024 directly addresses the need to protect biodiversity. Subdivision (a) of Section 93010 of the Public Resources Code enumerates programs eligible for the bond funds, including, but not limited to, land acquisition; habitat enhancement and restoration; rangeland, grazing land, and grassland protection; inland wetland conservation; ecosystem restoration on agricultural lands; climate adaptation and resiliency; monarch butterfly and pollinator rescue; and oak woodland conservation. Sections 93500 and 93530 of the Public Resources Code also directly address improving climate resilience and the sustainability of farms, ranches, and working lands through the use of conservation easements.(l) Voluntary conservation easements are a proven method that provides for the durable protection of these value landscapes at a fraction of the cost of fee ownership, while leaving the lands under private stewardship and on the property tax rolls.(m) Voluntary conservation easements eliminate the need for local jurisdictions or state agencies to improve and manage these lands in perpetuity.(n) There are over 300,000 acres of private working rangelands and agricultural property immediately available for voluntary protection through the use of conservation easements.(o) Voluntary conservation of these private working rangelands by 2030 will greatly advance the achievement of the state’s 30x30 goal.SEC. 2. Section 10332 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:10332. As used in this division, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Board” means the Wildlife Conservation Board created pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1320) of Chapter 4 of Division 20 of the Fish and Game Code.(b) “Conservation easement” means a conservation easement, as defined by Section 815.1 of the Civil Code, that is perpetual.(c) “Eligible entity” means an entity that meets all of the following criteria:(1) The entity has received accreditation from the Land Trust Accreditation Commission at the time of applying for a grant.(2) The entity demonstrates the capacity to acquire an conservation easement within 18 months of the award of a grant.(3) The entity demonstrates the financial capacity to comply with perpetual stewardship monitoring requirements associated with accreditation from the Land Trust Accreditation Commission.(c)(d) “Local public agency” means any a city, county, city and county, resource conservation district, district formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3 of Division 5, authority formed pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 35100), or joint powers authority made up of two or more local public agencies and one or more state agencies.(d)(e) “Nonprofit organization” means any a nonprofit public benefit corporation formed pursuant to the Nonprofit Corporation Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), qualified to do business in California, and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code as a tax-exempt corporation that has as a principal purpose the conservation of land and water resources.(e)(f) “Property” means any real property, and any a perpetual interest therein, including land, conservation easements, and land containing water rights.(f)(g) “Qualified property” means property that is rangeland, grazing land, or grassland and is used or is suitable for grazing; is zoned for agricultural grazing, or open-space use; and is used or suitable for habitat for aquatic or terrestrial wildlife species or native plants.(g)(h) “State agency” means any a public entity created by statute within the Natural Resources Agency.SEC. 3. Section 10334 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:10334. Funds Except as specified in Section 10334.5, funds may be expended by the board for the acquisition of conservation easements over qualified property pursuant to the authority granted to the board under Section 1348 of the Fish and Game Code. The board may also make grants of funds to a state agency, local public agency, or nonprofit organization for the acquisition of conservation easements over qualified property.SEC. 4. Section 10334.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:10334.5. (a) Of the amount described in subdivision (a) of Section 93010, the sum of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund to the board for the purposes described in this section and consistent with this division.(b) The board shall award the funds described in subdivision (a) as grants to eligible entities to acquire conservation easements on qualified property that is privately owned and supports the production of food and fiber and ecosystem services, including, but not limited to, wildfire fuel reduction, groundwater recharge, wildlife habitat, and open vistas. A grant awarded to an eligible entity may comprise both of the following amounts:(1) Up to 100 percent of the appraised value of a conservation easement, as determined by a qualified appraisal that has been reviewed and approved by the Department of General Services.(2) Up to seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for expenses related to the processing of a conservation easement.(c) (1) On or before June 30, 2027, the board shall disburse 75 percent of the funds described in subdivision (a) to grantees through grant agreements.(2) On or before June 30, 2028, the board shall disburse the remaining 25 percent of the funds described in subdivision (a) to grantees through grant agreements.(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the board shall allocate the funds described in subdivision (a) as follows:(A) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) to eligible entities in the northern region, consisting of the Counties of Lassen, Modoc, Plumas, Shasta, Siskiyou, Tehama, and Trinity.(B) Forty million dollars ($40,000,000) to eligible entities in the north coast region, consisting of the Counties of Del Norte, Humboldt, Lake, Mendocino, and Sonoma.(C) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to eligible entities in the mountain region, consisting of the Counties of Alpine, El Dorado, Mono, Nevada, Placer, and Sierra.(D) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to eligible entities in the Sacramento Valley region, consisting of the Counties of Butte, Colusa, Glenn, Sacramento, Solano, Sutter, Yolo, and Yuba.(E) Fifty-five million dollars ($55,000,000) to eligible entities in the San Joaquin Valley region, consisting of the Counties of Amador, Calaveras, Fresno, Kern, Kings, Madera, Mariposa, Merced, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, Tulare, and Tuolumne.(F) Seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) to eligible entities in the bay area region, consisting of the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Napa, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, San Francisco, and San Mateo.(G) Ninety-five million dollars ($95,000,000) to eligible entities in the central coast region, consisting of the Counties of Monterey, San Benito, Santa Barbara, and San Luis Obispo.(H) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) to eligible entities in the desert region, consisting of the Counties of Inyo and San Bernardino.(I) Seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) to eligible entities in the southern region, consisting of the Counties of Imperial, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Diego, and Ventura.(2) If the board determines, on or before June 30, 2027, that it is unable to allocate funds in accordance with paragraph (1) due to a lack of demand, the board may, in its discretion, reallocate those funds to another region where there is a higher demand.(e) On or before June 30, 2029, a grantee shall expend the grant funds to acquire a conservation easement and record the conservation easement.(f) The board may partner with, and receive funds from, land trusts that are certified by the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture under the federal Agricultural Conservation Easement Program, as part of the Agricultural Land Easement component of the program, for purposes of implementing this section.SECTION 1.Section 10331 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:10331.The California Rangeland, Grazing Land, and Grassland Protection Program is hereby established to protect the state’s rangeland, grazing land, and grasslands through the use of conservation easements, for the following purposes:(a)To prevent the conversion of rangeland, grazing land, and grassland to nonagricultural uses.(b)To protect the long-term sustainability of livestock grazing.(c)To ensure continued wildlife, water quality, watershed, and open-space benefits to the state from livestock grazing.